Utah statutes.
77-29-11.   Interstate agreement -- Attorney general as administrator and information agent.

The attorney general is hereby designated as the officer who shall be the central administrator of and information agent for the agreement on detainers as provided in Article VII of the agreement.



Enacted by Chapter 15, 1980 General Session

